test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-uasi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - uási: # i-stems - ok
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uáṣi
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uáṣán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: ossijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uáˊsittáá
    uási+N+Ess: uássin
    uási+N+Par: uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: [oosij, oˊsij]
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: ossijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: oˊsijguin
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: oˊsijttáá
